test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd-syllable nouns, without those only in plural. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested. Lexicon ÅRES,GÁMAS, SÅHKÅR, GAHPER, BENA, BAVSEV, GÅRDAL, RÁBEV, SEKKAS, DERDAJ, BØSOJ, GUOVSOJVUOJOJ, RITJAS, TJÅLKES, VÁJES, BÁRNEP, SÁGAS, SÁGE, BUTJES, SJIEVNNJET

Tests:
  Noun - boagos: # ÅRES
    boagos+N+Sg+Nom: boagos
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: båhkusimme
    boagos+N+Sg+Acc: båhkusav
    boagos+N+Sg+Ine: båhkusin
    boagos+N+Sg+Ill: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Sg+Ela: båhkusis
    boagos+N+Sg+Com: båhkusijn
    boagos+N+Pl+Nom: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Pl+Gen: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Pl+Acc: båhkusijt
    boagos+N+Pl+Ine: båhkusijn
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill: båhkusijda
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: båhkusijdasihtte
    boagos+N+Pl+Ela: båhkusijs
    boagos+N+Pl+Com: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Ess: [båhkusin, boagon]
    boagos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båhkusasj
    boagos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båhkusattjasj
    boagos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: båhkusahtes
    boagos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: båhkusahttásit 
    boagos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    boagos+N+Abe: [båhkusahtá, båhkusahti] # -ahti is used in "Tjaktjalasta" and described in Giellaj Hilá, but not familliar to Inga

  Noun - buonjos: # ÅRES
    buonjos+N+Sg+Nom: buonjos
    buonjos+N+Sg+Acc: buodnjusav
    buonjos+N+Sg+Com: buodnjusijn
    buonjos+N+Ess: [buonjon, buodnjusin]
    buonjos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: buodnjusahtes
    buonjos+N+Abe: [buodnjusahtá, buodnjusahti] # -ahti is used in "Tjaktjalasta" and described in Giellaj Hilá, but not familliar to Inga

  Noun - bálos: # ÅRES
    bálos+N+Sg+Nom: bálos
    bálos+N+Sg+Acc: bállusav
    bálos+N+Pl+Com: bállusij
    bálos+N+Ess: [bálon, bállusin]

  Noun - båros: # ÅRES
    båros+N+Sg+Nom: båros
    båros+N+Sg+Ill: bårrusij

  Noun - dieres: # ÅRES
    dieres+N+Sg+Nom: dieres
    dieres+N+Sg+Ine: [dærrásin, därrásin]
    dieres+N+Sg+Ill: [dærrásij, därrásij]
    dieres+N+Abe: [dærrásahtá, därrásahtá, därrásahti, dærrásahti]

  Noun - duber: # ÅRES
    duber+N+Sg+Nom: duber
    duber+N+Sg+Gen: duhpára
    duber+N+Sg+Ill: duhpárij
    duber+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duhpárasj
    duber+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duhpárattjasj
    duber+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: duhpárahtes
    duber+N+Abe: [duhpárahtá, duhpárahti]

  Noun - gielov: # ÅRES
    gielov+N+Sg+Nom: gielov
    gielov+N+Sg+Ine: giellumin
    gielov+N+Sg+Ill: giellumij

  Noun - gæsás: #  GÁMAS
    gæsás+N+Sg+Nom: [gæsás, gäsás]
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ine: [gæssásin, gässásin]
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ill: [gæssásij, gässásij]
    gæsás+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [gæssásasj, gässásasj]
    gæsás+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [gæssásattjasj, gässásattjasj]
    gæsás+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [gæssásahtes, gässásahtes]
    gæsás+N+Abe: [gæssásahtá, gässásahtá, gæssásahti, gässásahti]

  Noun - tjuorvas: # GÁMAS
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Nom: tjuorvas
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Ill: tjuorvvasij
    tjuorvas+N+Pl+Nom: tjuorvvasa

  Noun - huvkas: # GÁMAS
    huvkas+N+Sg+Nom: huvkas
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ine: huvkkasin
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ill: huvkkasij

  Noun - germaj: # GÁMAS
    germaj+N+Sg+Nom: germaj
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen: [gærmmaha, gärmmaha]
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [gærmmahimme, gärmmahimme]
    germaj+N+Sg+Acc: [gærmmahav, gärmmahav]
    germaj+N+Sg+Ine: [gærmmahin, gärmmahin]
    germaj+N+Sg+Ill: [gærmmahij, gärmmahij]
    germaj+N+Sg+Ela: [gærmmahis, gärmmahis]
    germaj+N+Sg+Com: [gærmmahijn, gärmmahijn]
    germaj+N+Pl+Nom: [gærmmaha, gärmmaha]
    germaj+N+Pl+Gen: [gærmmahij, gärmmahij]
    germaj+N+Pl+Acc: [gærmmahijt, gärmmahijt]
    germaj+N+Pl+Ine: [gærmmahijn, gärmmahijn]
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill: [gærmmahijda, gärmmahijda]
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [gærmmahijdasihtte, gärmmahijdasihtte]
    germaj+N+Pl+Ela: [gærmmahijs, gärmmahijs]
    germaj+N+Pl+Com: [gærmmahij, gärmmahij]
    germaj+N+Ess: [gærmmahin, gärmmahin, german]
    germaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [gærmmahasj, gärmmahasj]

  Noun - hávstar: # GÁMAS
    hávstar+N+Sg+Nom: hávstar
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ine: hávsstarin
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ill: hávsstarij

  Noun - luoppal: # GÁMAS
    luoppal+N+Sg+Nom: luoppal
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ine: luobbalin
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ill: luobbalij

  Noun - lárkav: # GÁMAS
    lárkav+N+Sg+Nom: lárkav
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ine: lárkkamin
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ill: lárkkamij

  Noun - ganjál: # GÁMAS
    ganjál+N+Sg+Nom: ganjál
    ganjál+N+Sg+Gen: gadnjala
    ganjál+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gadnjalimme
    ganjál+N+Sg+Acc: gadnjalav
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ine: gadnjalin
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ill: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ela: gadnjalis
    ganjál+N+Sg+Com: gadnjalijn
    ganjál+N+Pl+Nom: gadnjala
    ganjál+N+Pl+Gen: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Pl+Acc: gadnjalijt
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ine: gadnjalijn
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ill: gadnjalijda
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gadnjalijdasihtte
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ela: gadnjalijs
    ganjál+N+Pl+Com: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Ess: [gadnjalin, ganján] # short essive is not used by Inga
    ganjál+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gadnjalasj
    ganjál+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gadnjalattjasj
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gadnjalahtes
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gadnjalahtes
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gadnjalahttásit
    ganjál+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ganjál+N+Abe: [gadnjalahtá, gadnjalahti]

  Noun - návdár: # SÅHKÅR
    návdár+N+Sg+Nom: návdár
    návdár+N+Sg+Ine: návddárin
    návdár+N+Sg+Ill: návddárij
    návdár+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: návddárasj
    návdár+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: návddárattjasj
    návdár+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: návddárahtes
    návdár+N+Abe: [návddárahtá, návddárahti]

  Noun - pihper: # SÅHKÅR
    pihper+N+Sg+Nom: pihper
    pihper+N+Sg+Ine: pihppárin
    pihper+N+Sg+Ill: pihppárij

  Noun - stájnar: # SÅHKÅR
    stájnar+N+Sg+Nom: stájnar
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ine: stájnnarin
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ill: stájnnarij

  Noun - tjieller: # SÅHKÅR
    tjieller+N+G3+Sg+Nom: tjieller
    tjieller+N+G3+Sg+Ine: [tjællárin, tjällárin]
    tjieller+N+G3+Sg+Ill: [tjællárij, tjällárij]

  Noun - adám: # GAHPER
    adám+N+Sg+Nom: adám
    adám+N+Sg+Ine: adámin
    adám+N+Sg+Ill: adámij
    adám+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: adámasj
    adám+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: adámattjasj
    adám+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: adámahttásit
    adám+N+Abe: [adámahtá, adámahti]

  Noun - albas: # GAHPER
    albas+N+Sg+Nom: albas
    albas+N+Sg+Ine: albbasin
    albas+N+Sg+Ill: albbasij

  Noun - ulmusj: # GAHPER
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: ulmutjin
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjij

  Noun - berun: # GAHPER
    berun+N+Sg+Nom: [berun, perun]
    berun+N+Sg+Ine: [berunin, perunin]
    berun+N+Sg+Ill: [berunij, perunij]
  
  Noun - snjissjkom: # GAHPER
    snjissjkom+N+Sg+Nom: [snjissjkom, sjnjissjkom]
    snjissjkom+N+Sg+Ine: [sjnjissjkomin, snjissjkomin]
    snjissjkom+N+Sg+Ill: [snjissjkomij, sjnjissjkomij]

  Noun - båndor: # SÅHKÅR
    båndor+N+Sg+Nom: båndor
    båndor+N+Sg+Gen: bånndura
    båndor+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bånndurimme
    båndor+N+Sg+Acc: bånndurav
    båndor+N+Sg+Ine: bånndurin
    båndor+N+Sg+Ill: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Sg+Ela: bånnduris
    båndor+N+Sg+Com: bånndurijn
    båndor+N+Pl+Nom: bånndura
    båndor+N+Pl+Gen: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Pl+Acc: bånndurijt
    båndor+N+Pl+Ine: bånndurijn
    båndor+N+Pl+Ill: bånndurijda
    båndor+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: bånndurijdasihtte
    båndor+N+Pl+Ela: bånndurijs
    båndor+N+Pl+Com: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Ess: bånndurin
    båndor+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bånndurasj
    båndor+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bånndurattjasj
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: bånndurahtes
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: bånndurahtes
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bånndurahttásit
    båndor+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    båndor+N+Abe: [bånndurahtá, bånndurahti]

  Noun - beraj: # GÁMAS
    beraj+N+Sg+Nom: beraj
    beraj+N+Sg+Gen: berraha
    beraj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: berrahimme
    beraj+N+Sg+Acc: berrahav
    beraj+N+Sg+Ine: berrahin
    beraj+N+Sg+Ill: berrahij
    beraj+N+Sg+Ela: berrahis
    beraj+N+Sg+Com: berrahijn
    beraj+N+Pl+Nom: berraha
    beraj+N+Pl+Gen: berrahij
    beraj+N+Pl+Acc: berrahijt
    beraj+N+Pl+Ine: berrahijn
    beraj+N+Pl+Ill: berrahijda
    beraj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: berrahijdasihtte
    beraj+N+Pl+Ela: berrahijs
    beraj+N+Pl+Com: berrahij
    beraj+N+Ess: [berrahin, beran] #short essive is not used by Inga
    beraj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berrahasj
    beraj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berrahattjasj
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: berrahahtes
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: berrahahtes
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: berrahahttásit
    beraj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    beraj+N+Abe: [berrahahtá, berrahahti]

  Noun - álmmuk: # GAHPER
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Nom: álmmuk
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Gen: álmmuga
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: álmmugimme
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Acc: álmmugav
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ine: álmmugin
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ill: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ela: álmmugis
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Com: álmmugijn
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Nom: álmmuga
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Gen: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Acc: álmmugijt
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ine: álmmugijn
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ill: álmmugijda
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: álmmugijdasihtte
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ela: álmmugijs
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Com: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Ess: álmmugin
    álmmuk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álmmugasj
    álmmuk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álmmugattjasj
    álmmuk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: álmmugahtes
    álmmuk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: álmmugahtes
    álmmuk+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    álmmuk+N+Abe: [álmmugahtá, álmmugahti]

  Noun - garŋŋel: # GAHPER
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋel
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Gen: garŋŋela
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: garŋŋelimme
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Acc: garŋŋelav
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ine: garŋŋelin
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ill: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ela: garŋŋelis
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Com: garŋŋelijn
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Nom: garŋŋela
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Gen: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Acc: garŋŋelijt
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ine: garŋŋelijn
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ill: garŋŋelijda
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: garŋŋelijdasihtte
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ela: garŋŋelijs
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Com: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Ess: garŋŋelin
    garŋŋel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelasj
    garŋŋel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelattjasj
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelahtes
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: garŋŋelahtes
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: garŋŋelahttásit
    garŋŋel+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    garŋŋel+N+Abe: [garŋŋelahtá, garŋŋelahti]

  Noun - miedem: # GAHPER
    miedem+N+Sg+Nom: miedem
    miedem+N+Sg+Gen: miedema
    miedem+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: miedemimme
    miedem+N+Sg+Acc: miedemav
    miedem+N+Sg+Ine: miedemin
    miedem+N+Sg+Ill: miedemij
    miedem+N+Sg+Ela: miedemis
    miedem+N+Sg+Com: miedemijn
    miedem+N+Pl+Nom: miedema
    miedem+N+Pl+Gen: miedemij
    miedem+N+Pl+Acc: miedemijt
    miedem+N+Pl+Ine: miedemijn
    miedem+N+Pl+Ill: miedemijda
    miedem+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: miedemijdasihtte
    miedem+N+Pl+Ela: miedemijs
    miedem+N+Pl+Com: miedemij
    miedem+N+Ess: miedemin
    miedem+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: miedemasj
    miedem+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: miedemattjasj
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [miedemahttá, miedemahttása]
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: miedemahtes
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: miedemahttásit
    miedem+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    miedem+N+Abe: [miedemahtá, miedemahti]
